New York, session 2025-2026, A2310.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 8413 2 to read as follows: 3 § 8413. Substance use disorder education. 1. Each licensed mental 4 health practitioner required under this article to register triennially 5 with the department to practice in this state shall receive education 6 and training regarding substance use disorder, the specific needs of the 7 substance use disorder community and co-occurring disorders. The 8 purpose of such training shall be to ensure that mental health practi- 9 tioners are adequately equipped to care for patients who are dealing 10 with co-occurring disorders. 11 2. The department shall incorporate such education and training into 12 the mental health practitioner licensing requirements, as well as the 13 continuing education requirements for mental health practitioners who 14 support patients with substance use disorders or co-occurring disorders. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05734-01-5